Illinois, session 104th, HB3011.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Community College Act is amended by 5adding Section 3-7.12 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 805/3-7.12 new)7    Sec. 3-7.12. Oath of office for board of trustees.8    (a) Each member of the board of trustees of a community 9college district shall, before entering upon the duties of the 10office, take and subscribe to the following oath or 11affirmation: "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will 12support the Constitution of the United States and the 13Constitution of the State of Illinois, and that I will 14faithfully discharge the duties of the office of trustee of 15[Community College District Number] to the best of my 16ability.".17    (b) The oath or affirmation shall be administered by the 18secretary of the board, a notary public, or any other officer 19authorized to administer oaths under State law. The completed 20oath shall be filed with the secretary of the board and made 21part of the official records of the community college 22district.23    (c) No trustee may exercise the powers or perform the   HB3011 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11503 LNS 21592 b1duties of office until the oath has been taken and properly 2filed.